src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! ==================== !
!! !!!Adjective morphology !
! ==================== !

!! !!Ad hoc lexica

!LEXICON xl1 ! TODO check -- done
!l1 ;

!LEXICON xl26 ! TODO check
!l26 ;

!! !!The lexicons

! LEXICON l0 ! stigbend hjáorð, t.d. norður
!   l0pos  ;
  
! LEXICON l0pos
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:  # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:    # ;
!  +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:    # ;
 
! LEXICON l0_1
!  l0pos ;
!  l0_1comsup ;
 
! LEXICON l0_1comsup
!  +A: Comp_Ri ;
 
! LEXICON l0_2
!  l0pos ;
!  l0_2comsup ;

! LEXICON l0_2comsup
!  +A: Comp_Ari ;

! LEXICON l0_def
!  l0pos ;
!  +A: Pos_Def ;

LEXICON l1 ! ríkur
 l1pos ;
 l1comsup ;
 
LEXICON l1pos
 +A: Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A: Pl_Msc1  ;
 +A: Sg_Fem1  ;
 +A: Pl_Fem1  ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1  ;
 +A: Pl_Neu1  ;
 +A: Pos_Def  ;

LEXICON l1comsup
 +A: Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l1_umlaut ! tungur
 l1pos ;
 +A:^IUML Comp_Ri ;

LEXICON l1_ØÆumlaut ! høgur
 +A:øg Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A:øg Pl_Msc1  ;
 +A:øg Sg_Fem1  ;
 +A:øg Pl_Fem1  ;
 +A:øg Sg_Neu1  ;
 +A:øg Pl_Neu1  ;
 +A:øg Pos_Def  ;
 +A:æg Comp_Ri  ;

LEXICON l1_1
 +A:ring Sg_Msc1  ;
 +A:ring Pl_Msc1  ;
 +A:ring Sg_Fem1  ;
 +A:ring Pl_Fem1  ;
 +A:ring Sg_Neu1  ;
 +A:ring Pl_Neu1  ;
 +A:ring Pos_Def  ;
 +A:ver Comp_Ri  ;

LEXICON l1/12_ll
 l1 ;
 l12_ll ;
 
LEXICON l1/24
 l1 ;
 l24 ;

LEXICON l2 ! leysur
 +A: Sg_Msc2   ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2   ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2   ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2   ;
 +A: Sg_Neu2   ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2   ;
 +A: Pos_Def   ;
 +A: Comp_Ari  ;


LEXICON l1/9
 l1 ;
 l9 ;
 
LEXICON l5/21
 l5 ;
 l21 ;
 
LEXICON l5	! spiltur
 l5pos ;
 l5comsup ;
 
LEXICON l5pos
 +A: Sg_Msc1    ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2	;
 +A: Sg_Fem2    ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2    ;
 +A: Sg_Neu3	;
 +A: Pl_Neu2	;
 +A: Pos_Def	;
 
LEXICON l5comsup 
 +A: Comp_Ari	;
 
LEXICON l5_1
 l5pos ;
 
 
LEXICON l6	! brekaður
 +A: Sg_Msc1    ;
 +A: Pl_Msc1	;
 +A: Sg_Fem1    ;
 +A: Pl_Fem1    ;
 +A: Sg_Neu3	;
 +A: Pl_Neu1	;
 +A: Pos_Def	;
 +A: Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l6_umlaut ! skaftur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Neu3_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	  ;
 +A: Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l7	! blindur
 +A:d Sg_Msc1   ;
 +A:d Pl_Msc2	;
 +A:d Sg_Fem2   ;
 +A:d Pl_Fem2   ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 +A:d Pl_Neu2	;
 +A:d Pos_Def	;
 +A:d Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l8	! kaldur
 +A:d Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 +A:d Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dum 	# ;
 +A:d Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>d		# ;
 +A:d Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>dum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ds	 # ;
 +A:d Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>dum	# ;
 +A:d Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A: Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l9	! spakur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	  ;
 +A: Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l10 ! drúgvur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:vur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:van	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:vum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:v Pl_Msc1	;
 +A:v Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A:v Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>vum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:v Pl_Neu1	;
 +A:v Pos_Def	;
 +A:v Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l10_m ! grúsommur
 +A:m Sg_Msc1   ;
 +A:m Pl_Msc1	;
 +A:m Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A:m Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>mum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:m Pl_Neu1	;
 +A:m Pos_Def	;
 +A:m Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l11 ! flógvur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:gvur	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:gvan	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:gvum	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:s	 	 # ;
 +A:gv Pl_Msc1	 ;
 +A:gv Sg_Fem1   ;
 +A:gv Pl_Fem1   ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>tt 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>tt	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>gvum	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +A:gv Pl_Neu1	;
 +A:gv Pos_Def	;
 +A:gv Comp_Ari	;

LEXICON l12_ll ! snjallur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>lur	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>lan 		 	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>lum	 	 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 	 	 # ;
 +A:l Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:l Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:l Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	     	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>lum	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:l Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:l Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:l Comp_Ari	   ;

LEXICON l12_ss ! hvassur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>sur			 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>san			 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>sum		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s			 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:s Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:s Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t			 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t			 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>sum		 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s			 # ;
 +A:s Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:s Pos_Def2	  ;
 +A:s Comp_Ari	  ;

LEXICON l12_pp ! knappur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>pur	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>pan	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>pum		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:p Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:p Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:p Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>pum	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:p Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:p Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:p Comp_Ari	   ;

LEXICON l12_kk ! skakkur
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>kur	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>kan	 		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>kum		 # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A:k Sg_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A:k Pl_Fem1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	    	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>kum	 	 # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 		 # ;
 +A:k Pl_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A:k Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:k Comp_Ari	   ;

LEXICON l13/1
 l13 ;
 l1 ;
 
LEXICON l13 ! blankur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um 	# ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>		# ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A: Comp_Ari  ;
 
LEXICON l13_1 ! langur
 +A: Sg_Msc1_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Msc2_Uuml ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um 	# ;
 +A: Sg_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>		# ;
 +A: Pl_Fem2_Uuml ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Sg_Neu1_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pl_Neu2_Uuml ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	# ;
 +A: Pos_Def2	   ;
 +A:^UUML Comp_Ri  ;
 
