src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
blýtungur:blýtung l1_umlaut ;
favnhøgur:favn#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
fátækur:fátæk l1 ;
fóðurtungur:fóðurtung l1_umlaut ;
gróðrarringur:gróðrar# l1_1 ;
gróðurtungur:gróðurtung l1_umlaut ;
grundarringur:grundar# l1_1 ;
grundringur:grund# l1_1 ;
hagaringur:haga# l1_1 ;
harmtungur:harmtung l1_umlaut ;
heilsuringur:heilsu# l1_1 ;
himinhøgur:himin#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
hugsanartungur:hugsanartung l1_umlaut ;
høgur:h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
javntungur:javntung l1_umlaut ;
kollektivur:kollektiv l1 ;
manshøgur:mans#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
miðvísur:miðvís l2 ;
móringur:mó# l1_1 ;
neytahøgur:neyta#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
risahøgur:risa#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
rættlátur:rættlát l1 ;
seyðhøgur:seyð#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
sjóringur:sjó# l1_1 ;
skammtungur:skammtung l1_umlaut ;
sóttarsjúkur:sóttarsjúk l1 ;
tindhøgur:tind#h l1_ØÆumlaut ;
tungur:tung l1_umlaut ;
veðurringur:veður# l1_1 ;
vitvísur:vitvís l2 ;
blíðlyntur:blíðlynt l5 ;
elapinkutur:elapinkut l5 ;
gorrutur:gorrut l5 ;
hæsmæltur:hæsmælt l5 ;
meklutur:meklut l5 ;
siðaspiltur:siðaspilt l5 ;
palatalur:palatal l1 ;
tjørutur:tjørut l5 ;
eintáttaður:eintáttað l6 ;
hágávaður:hágávað l6 ;
kollveltingarhugaður:kollveltingarhugað l6 ;
kollrakaður:kollrakað l6 ;
skammsignaður:skammsignað l6 ;
tvíballaður:tvíballað l6 ;
blóðrendur:blóðren l7 ;
eyðsýndur:eyðsýn l7 ;
heimagjørdur:heimagjør l7 ;
ljósoygdur:ljósoyg l7 ;
ótøvdur:ótøv l7 ;
starblindur:starblin l7 ;
villfremmandur:villfremman l7 ;
einfaldur:einfal l8 ;
flísalagdur:flísalag l8 ;
hálvkaldur:hálvkal l8 ;
ísaglerakaldur:ísaglerakal l8 ;
kenslukaldur:kenslukal l8 ;
sagdur:sag l8 ;
tvífaldur:tvífal l8 ;
deyðaspakur:deyðaspak l9 ;
flatur:flat l9 ;
jarpur:jarp l9 ;
latur:lat l9 ;
naskur:nask l9 ;
pillsvakur:pillsvak l9 ;
smalur:smal l9 ;
stigjavnur:stigjavn l9 ;
bljúgvur:bljúg l10 ;
blúgvur:blúg l10 ;
drjúgvur:drjúg l10 ;
eydnudrúgvur:eydnudrúg l10 ;
happadrúgvur:happadrúg l10 ;
matdrúgvur:matdrúg l10 ;
máldrúgvur:máldrúg l10 ;
ódrúgvur:ódrúg l10 ;
flógvur:fló l11 ;
hálvflógvur:hálvfló l11 ;
órógvur:óró l11 ;
ótrúgvur:ótrú l11 ;
rógvur:ró l11 ;
skyldutrúgvur:skyldutrú l11 ;
tortrúgvur:tortrú l11 ;
trúgvur:trú l11 ;
bakhallur:bakhal l12_ll ;
bráðhvassur:bráðhvas l12_ss;
egghvassur:egghvas l12_ss;
eiturhvassur:eiturhvas l12_ss;
eysturhallur:eysturhal l12_ll ;
halahvassur:halahvas l12_ss;
hárhvassur:hárhvas l12_ss;
hugsnjallur:hugsnjal l12_ll ;
hvappur:hvap l12_pp;
hvassur:hvas l12_ss;
knappur:knap l12_pp;
knívhvassur:knívhvas l12_ss;
krappur:krap l12_pp;
lagghallur:lagghal l12_ll ;
løgghallur:løgghal l12_ll ;
nakkakrappur:nakkakrap l12_pp;
óhvassur:óhvas l12_ss;
parthallur:parthal l12_ll ;
skaftur:skaft l6_umlaut ;
skakkur:skak l12_kk;
slækkur:slæk l12_kk;
skrappur:skrap l12_pp;
tilhallur:tilhal l12_ll ;
vinstrahallur:vinstrahal l12_ll ;
alnarlangur:alnar#lang l13_1 ;
áralangur:ára#lang l13_1 ;
einsamur:einsam l13 ;
endilangur:endi#lang l13_1 ;
gróðursamur:gróðursam l13 ;
hálslangur:háls#lang l13_1 ;
illgrunasamur:illgrunasam l13 ;
kynrangur:kynrang l13 ;
leggjalangur:leggja#lang l13_1 ;
lívlangur:lív#lang l13_1 ;
møðsamur:møðsam l13 ;
óvanur:óvan l13 ;
skankalangur:skanka#lang l13_1 ;
sorgsamur:sorgsam l13 ;
varsamur:varsam l13 ;
íðulangur:íðu#lang l13_1 ;
forhánisligur:forhánislig l1 ;
ódligur:ódlig l1 ;
tvígildigur:tvígildig l1 ;
vælumhugsaður:vælumhugsað l6 ;
grúsommur:grúsom l10_m ;
hagur:hag l1/9 ;
eyðvalur:eyðval l1/24 ;
vesallur:vesall l1/12_ll ;
vænur:væn l13/1 ;
flentur:flent l5 ;
meltaður:meltað l6 ;
ansaleysur:ansa#leys l2 ;
dygðarleysur:dygðar#leys l2 ;
heimleysur:heim#leys l2 ;
máttleysur:mátt#leys l2 ;
skeggleysur:skegg#leys l2 ;
verðleysur:verð#leys l2 ;
hundbardur:hund#bar l7 ;
millumlagdur:millum#lag l8 ;
handahagur:handa#hag l1/9 ;
eygnahagur:eygna#hag l1/9 ;
handhagur:hand#hag l1/9 ;
songhagur:song#hag l1/9 ;
orðhagur:orð#hag l1/9 ;
óhagur:ó#hag l1/9 ;
frímóðigur:frí#móðig l1 ;
eldkvæmur:eld#kvæm l13/1 ;
sprongkvæmur:sprong#kvæm l13/1 ;
spreingikvæmur:spreingi#kvæm l13/1 ;
nærkvæmur:nær#kvæm l13/1 ;
nákvæmur:ná#kvæm l13/1 ;
ovurviðkvæmur:ovur#við#kvæm l13/1 ;
undurvænur:undur#væn l13/1 ;
gullglæstur:gull#glæst l5/21 ;
innilæstur:inni#læst l5/21 ;
samanlæstur:saman#læst l5/21 ;
afturlæstur:aftur#læst l5/21 ;
avlæstur:av#læst l5/21 ;
ólæstur:ó#læst l5/21 ;
skarpræstur:skarp#ræst l5/21 ;
bleytræstur:bleyt#ræst l5/21 ;
